Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 1.1. General Provisions.
§ 51.1-124.7.
Distribution of assets upon repeal of system.

If the General Assembly repeals the provisions of this chapter or terminates its application to any person, the Board shall continue to administer the Retirement System in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for the sole benefit of the then members, any beneficiaries then receiving retirement allowances, and any future persons entitled to receive benefits under a joint and last-survivor option who are designated by a member.

Upon repeal or termination of the Retirement System, the assets of the Retirement System shall be allocated by the Board in an equitable manner to provide benefits for the persons stated in subsection A of this section in accordance with the provisions of this chapter but based on creditable service and average final compensation as of the date of repeal or termination and in the following order:

For the benefit of the then members to the extent of their individual account in the members’ contribution account.

If any funds remain, then for the benefit of the then beneficiaries and persons already designated by former members who are then beneficiaries under a joint and last-survivor option, to the extent of the then actuarial value of their retirement allowances.

If any funds remain, then for the benefit of members, and persons, if any, designated by them under a joint and last-survivor option, to the extent, not provided under subdivision 1 of this subsection, of the then actuarial value of their accrued future retirement allowances. The allocation under this subdivision shall be the basis of the oldest-ages-first method.The employer is required to contribute the amount necessary to make up any insufficiency of assets needed to provide all benefits payable under subdivisions 1 and 2 of this subsection.

The allocation of assets of the Retirement System shall be carried out by the Board as the benefits become due or by the transfer of such assets to any retirement system replacing this Retirement System. The vesting of benefits shall be fully maintained under the new retirement system. Any funds remaining in the assets of this retirement system after all of the vested benefits have been paid shall revert to the general fund.

Any allocation of assets shall be final and binding on all persons entitled to benefits.

Upon the termination or partial termination of the Retirement System, each affected member shall become fully vested, as of the termination date or partial termination date, in his service retirement allowance to the extent funded, regardless of the length of service or amount of creditable service.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.16; 1960, c. 604; 1977, c. 620; 1978, c. 841; 1980, cc. 637, 638, 646; 1982, cc. 467, 478; 1990, c. 832, § 51.1-105; 1994, cc. 4, 85; 2014, c. 356.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356 added subsection E.

§ 51.1-124.8.
Persons affected by changes in retirement benefits.

Unless otherwise specifically stated, legislation which effects a change in the amount of a retirement benefit other than a post-retirement supplement shall be construed to effect only the benefits of those persons who qualify for a retirement allowance on or after the effective date of the legislation.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.16; 1960, c. 604; 1977, c. 620; 1978, c. 841; 1980, cc. 637, 638, 646; 1982, cc. 467, 478; 1990, c. 832, § 51.1-106; 1994, cc. 4, 85.

§ 51.1-124.9.
Changes or errors in records resulting in erroneous payments; employer liability.

If any change or error in records results in any member or beneficiary receiving more or less than he would have been entitled to receive from the Retirement System had the records been correct, the Board shall, subject to the provisions of subsection B, correct the error and as far as practicable adjust the payments so that the actuarial equivalent of the correct benefit shall be paid.
A. 1. If any change or error in records results in any member or beneficiary receiving more or less than he would have been entitled to receive from the Retirement System had the records been correct, the Board shall, subject to the provisions of subsection B, correct the error and as far as practicable adjust the payments so that the actuarial equivalent of the correct benefit shall be paid.

If a member has been overpaid through no fault of his and could not reasonably have been expected to detect the error the Board may waive any repayment which it believes would cause hardship.

Upon determination that any person has erroneously been included in membership in the Retirement System, accumulated contributions resulting from the erroneous membership shall be refunded.

The Board is authorized to recover any overpayments, from an employer found to be responsible for such overpayments, to a member or beneficiary (i) whose average final compensation exceeds the limitation in §

51.1-152

, (ii) who receives in-service distributions because the member or beneficiary is rehired by the employer without either a bona fide break in service, as determined by the Board, following retirement, or the break in service required under subdivision B 3 (a) of §

51.1-155

, or (iii) who the Board determines was in service as an employee covered for retirement purposes as prohibited by subdivision B 1 of §

51.1-155

.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.67; 1956, c. 690; 1976, c. 541; 1990, c. 832, § 51.1-107; 1994, cc. 4, 85; 2011, c. 747.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 747 added subsection and subdivision designations in subsection A; inserted “subject to the provisions of subsection B” in subdivision A 1; and added subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Recovery of overpayment resulting from a calculations error. —

The Virginia Retirement System
may recover the overpayments in benefits paid out to its retirees that were a result of an error in calculating the 2009 cost of living adjustments. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Richard H. Black, Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-103, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 86 (10/11/13).

§ 51.1-124.10.
Falsification of records; penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement or falsifies or permits the falsification of any Retirement System record in any attempt to defraud the Retirement System shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.14; 1990, c. 832, § 51.1-108; 1994, cc. 4, 85.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 51.1-124.11.
Recovery of payments procured by fraud, false statement, etc.

Any payment to a member or beneficiary which is later determined by the Board to have been procured on the basis of any false statement or falsification of any Retirement System record knowingly made by or on behalf of the member or beneficiary, or the member’s or beneficiary’s failure to make any required report of change in disability status, may be recovered from the member or beneficiary by the Board either by way of a credit against future payments due the member or beneficiary, by an action at law against the member or beneficiary, or by deducting any overpayment of benefits from insurance proceeds as provided in §

51.1-510

. Prior to making any such determination, the Board shall give the member or beneficiary reasonable prior written notice and an opportunity to be heard in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Any member or beneficiary aggrieved by such determination of the Board shall be entitled to judicial review pursuant to Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1998, c. 657.

§ 51.1-124.12.
Procedure when employer required to withdraw funds.

As used in this section, unless the context clearly shows otherwise, the following definitions shall apply.“Replacement employer” means an employer as defined in §

51.1-124.3

who enters into a written agreement with the Retirement System to assume all liabilities for retirement benefits, as provided herein due to a member or beneficiary whose coverage under the Retirement System is affected by the withdrawal of the withdrawing employer, that are attributable to service with and creditable compensation from the withdrawing employer.“Termination date” means the effective date of a change in an employer’s status from an agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or the termination of the employer’s existence that shall cause an employer participating in the Retirement System to become a withdrawing employer. If such date is in question or if the advance notification required by subsection C is not given, the termination date shall be the date determined by the Board.“Termination event” means an event that results in an employer which participates in the Retirement System ceasing to be an agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth.“Withdrawing employer” means an employer that is required to withdraw from the Retirement System under subsection B.

Any employer participating in the Retirement System which ceases to be an agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or which permanently ceases operations shall withdraw from the Retirement System as of the termination date. All benefit accrual for members employed by a withdrawing employer shall automatically cease as of the termination date.

A withdrawing employer shall provide written notification to the Board of its termination date. Notification shall be in the form of a certified copy of an ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of the employer and shall be provided to the Board at least 90 days prior to the termination date. Upon receipt of notification or upon the Board’s determination that a termination event has occurred or will occur within 90 days, the Retirement System shall request its actuary to determine the present value of the Retirement System’s liability to each member, retired member, or beneficiary attributable to service with, and creditable compensation from, the withdrawing employer. For members, such calculation shall be determined based on the liability resulting from the present value of a service retirement allowance beginning at his normal retirement date. Such determination shall be based on actuarial principles and assumptions consistent with those used in the most recent actuarial valuation and financial report for the Retirement System. The expenses incurred by the Board for such actuarial determination report shall be the liability of the withdrawing employer.

If (i) no qualified retirement plan, as that term is defined in § 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, is established by the withdrawing employer, to which the assets and liabilities relating to members employed by such employer are transferred, as described in subsection E, or (ii) if no replacement employer has come forth within 90 days of the termination date, or within such other reasonable time as may be agreed to by the Board, benefits shall be determined as follows:

Each member or beneficiary whose coverage under the Retirement System is affected by the withdrawal of the employer shall become fully vested, as of the termination date, in his service retirement allowance attributable to creditable service with the withdrawing employer regardless of employment status or length of service with the withdrawing employer.

Each member, retired member or beneficiary shall be entitled to a distribution of the greater of (i) the balance in his member contribution account established pursuant to §

51.1-147

or (ii) the present value of his service retirement allowance attributable to creditable service and compensation with the withdrawing employer to which such member, retired member or beneficiary would have been entitled immediately prior to the termination event (plus additional amounts, if any, which the withdrawing employer may direct pursuant to subdivision 4 of this subsection). Such members, retired members, and beneficiaries may elect to receive such benefit either in the form of (i) a lump sum payment, subject to the eligible rollover distribution rules and withholding requirements of the Internal Revenue Code or (ii) an annuity equal to the service retirement benefit at normal retirement. The annuity shall be purchased from a private insurance company or companies as selected by the Board. The Board shall establish reasonable notice and election periods for the distribution made pursuant to this subsection. The distribution provided for in this subdivision shall be in the form of a lump sum, subject to applicable withholding requirements, upon the failure of a member, retired member or beneficiary to make an election.

If the assets held in the members’ contribution account established pursuant to §

51.1-147

and in the retirement allowance account established for withdrawing employer pursuant to §

51.1-148

are less than the amount needed to pay the benefits to which all affected members, retired members, and beneficiaries are entitled, the withdrawing employer shall make a contribution to the retirement allowance account in the amount necessary to make up any insufficiency in assets required to provide all benefits payable under this section. If the withdrawing employer fails to make the required contribution, assets held in the members’ contribution account established pursuant to § 51.1-147 and in the retirement allowance account established for the withdrawing employer pursuant to §

51.1-148

shall be distributed to members, retired members and beneficiaries in the manner described in §

51.1-139

.

Any assets remaining in the retirement account established for the withdrawing employer pursuant to § 51.1-148 after full satisfaction of liabilities to members, retired members and beneficiaries under this section shall be distributed on a pro rata basis (based on contributed funds within the immediately preceding 12 months) to any employers within the meaning of §

51.1-124.3

who, within the 12 months immediately preceding the termination date of the withdrawing employer, directly or indirectly, by appointment of the governing body of the withdrawing employer, controlled the activities of the withdrawing employer and contributed funds or property to the withdrawing employer; provided, however, that if there is no such employer, any remaining assets shall be used to offset expenses incurred by the Retirement System in any manner permitted by the Internal Revenue Code.

Upon completion of the distribution of assets held in the members’ contribution account established pursuant to § 51.1-147 and in the retirement allowance account established for the withdrawing employer pursuant to § 51.1-148 as provided in the section, the Retirement System shall have no further liability for such accounts.

If the withdrawing employer establishes or has established a qualified retirement plan, as that term is defined in § 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, which provides (i) for participation by members, retired members and the beneficiaries of members and retired members, (ii) for the transfer to the qualified retirement plan of all contributions and prior service attributable to creditable service with the withdrawing employer, and (iii) member benefits and vesting rights at least equal to those which each member would have been entitled under the Retirement System immediately before the termination of the employer’s affiliation with the Retirement System, the Board shall transfer to such qualified retirement plan all balances in the individual accounts of the members’ contribution account established pursuant to §

51.1-147

and all balances in the retirement allowance account established for such employer pursuant to §

51.1-148

and attributable to creditable service and compensation with such employer, including all earnings through and including the date of the transfer, less the reasonable expenses incurred by the Retirement System in connection with such transfer. Upon such transfer, all liabilities of the Retirement System for benefits, to the extent accrued as of the date of the transfer with respect to service with such employer shall be assumed by such qualified retirement plan and all liabilities of the Retirement System with respect thereto shall terminate.

If the withdrawing employer does not establish a qualified retirement plan, as that term is defined in § 401 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code and as provided for in subsection E, but a replacement employer has come forth within 90 days of the termination date, or within such other reasonable time as may be agreed to by the Board, the Board shall transfer to the retirement allowance account of such replacement employer, all balances in the retirement allowance account of the withdrawing employer, including all earnings through and including the date of the transfer. The members’ contribution account established pursuant to §

51.1-147

attributable to employees of the withdrawing employer shall be credited to member contribution accounts with the replacement employer. Notwithstanding however, if the balance of the retirement allowance account and the member contribution accounts exceed the actuarial present value of all liabilities with respect to employees of the withdrawing employer (after allowance for reimbursement to the Retirement System for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with such transfer), any amount in excess of 105 percent of such present value (including expenses) shall be paid on a pro rata basis (based on contributed funds within the immediately preceding 12 months) to any employers within the meaning of §

51.1-124.3

who within the 12 months immediately preceding the termination date of the withdrawing employer (i) directly or indirectly by appointment of the governing body of the withdrawing employer controlled the activities of the withdrawing employer and (ii) contributed funds or property to the withdrawing employer.

If there is no replacement employer, creditable service attributable to employment with a withdrawing employer shall be taken into consideration for purposes of determining whether each employee of the withdrawing employer meets the five or more year requirement to be entitled to a service allowance at normal retirement from the employment of an employer other than the withdrawing employer. If there is no replacement employer, neither creditable service nor creditable compensation attributable to employment with a withdrawing employer shall be taken into account for any other purpose under the Retirement System.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section or of any other law, if the withdrawing employer is a city which reverts to town status or otherwise loses its status as a city or is a town which loses its status as a town, then the members, retired members, and beneficiaries of the former city or town shall maintain all rights and privileges which they possess at the time of such change in status to current or future benefits from the Retirement System.

History.

1999, c. 284; 2000, c. 344; 2003, c. 267.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 267, cl. 2 provides: “That for termination dates prior to July 1, 2003, if the Virginia Retirement System has not made distributions for retirement benefits due to members, retired members, and beneficiaries of the withdrawing employer pursuant to §

51.1-124.12

, the Virginia Retirement System shall have until July 1, 2004, to enter into a written agreement with a replacement employer.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 344 added subsection G.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 267 added the definition of “replacement employer”; twice substituted “90” for “ninety” in subsection C; in the introductory language of subsection D, inserted “or” at the end of clause (i) and added clause (ii); inserted the clause (i) designation in subdivision D 4, substituted the language beginning “on a pro rata basis (based on contributed funds within the immediately preceding 12 months)” and ending “contributed funds or property to” for “to the withdrawing employer or transferred to another qualified retirement plan at the direction of,” and substituted “such employer” for “successor to the withdrawing employer directly responsible for the liabilities of the withdrawing employer”; inserted “less the reasonable expenses incurred by the Retirement System in connection with such transfer” at the end of the first sentence in subsection E; added present subsection F; redesignated former subsections F and G as present subsections G and H; and twice inserted “If there is no replacement employer” in subsection G.

§ 51.1-124.13.
Loss of benefits; certain felony convictions.

No person shall be entitled to any of the benefits of this title as provided in this section if (i) he is convicted of a felony and (ii) the person’s employer determines that the felony arose from misconduct occurring on or after July 1, 2011, in any position in which the person was a member covered for retirement purposes under any retirement system administered by the Board. Prior to making any such determination, the employer shall give the person reasonable prior written notice and provide an opportunity to be heard. The employer’s determination may be appealed in a manner consistent with subsection B, and no further proceedings shall follow the decision of the circuit court. The employer’s determination shall become final 10 calendar days after the date of the initial determination if no appeal is filed, or the date of the decision of the circuit court if an appeal is filed. A reversal by the circuit court of the employer’s determination shall render the determination null and void.

Proceedings for review of the determination of the employer may be made by the member filing a notice of appeal within five workdays of receipt of the determination. Within five workdays thereafter, the employer shall transmit, to the clerk of the circuit court in the jurisdiction where the employer is located, a copy of the record. The court, on motion of the member, may issue a writ of certiorari requiring the employer to transmit the record on or before a certain date. Within 30 days of receipt of such records, the court, sitting without a jury, shall hear the appeal on the record and such additional evidence as may be necessary to resolve any controversy as to the correctness of the record. The court, in its discretion, may receive such other evidence as the ends of justice require. The court may affirm the determination of the employer or may reverse or modify the determination. The decision of the court shall be rendered no later than the fifteenth day from the date of the conclusion of the hearing. The decision of the court shall be final and shall not be appealable. The circuit court hearing shall be at no cost to the Commonwealth or the member.

The Board shall implement the relinquishment of benefits under this title as soon as practicable after the employer notifies the Board of its final determination that the member’s felony conviction arose from misconduct in any position in which the member was a member in service.

If the person is or becomes a member in service after relinquishment of benefits under subsection C, he shall be entitled to the benefits under this title based solely on his service occurring after the relinquishment.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any service credit lost from relinquishment of benefits under subsection C shall be ineligible for subsequent purchase.

The governing body of any locality served by a constitutional officer shall be considered that officer’s employer for purposes of this section.

History.

2011, c. 483; 2012, cc. 56, 349.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 56 and 349 are identical, and substituted “subsection B, and” for “subsection E of §

2.2-3004

, and” in the second sentence of subsection A, added present subsection B and redesignated the following subsections accordingly, and substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B” in subsections D and E.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local funding of sheriffs’ offices. —

Governor of Virginia is the “employer” of statewide elected officers for the purposes of §

51.1-124.13

. Consistent with §

2.2-104

, however, the Governor may delegate the responsibility for implementing the employer’s role in §

51.1-124.13

to any state officer in the executive branch.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terence R. McAuliffe, Governor, Commonwealth of Virginia, No. 15-008, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 21 (7/31/15).

Governor as “employer.” —

General Assembly intended that forfeiture of benefits be given effect when a trial judge enters a judgment of conviction, notwithstanding any appellate review. If the conviction is later set aside on appeal, VRS has a procedure by which the retiree will have retirement benefits reinstated. This section requires the forfeiture of all benefits awarded under Title 51, including spousal benefits and benefits accrued from service in multiple offices or positions. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terence R. McAuliffe, Governor, Commonwealth of Virginia, No. 15-008, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 21 (7/31/15).

Discretion of employer in filing Form VRS-180. —

Statute allows for no discretion on the part of the employer once a final determination has been made that the felony arose from misconduct in a Virginia Retirement System covered position with the employer, despite discretionary language in an earlier version of the form. See opinion of Attorney General to Andrew R. McRoberts, Esquire, Essex County Attorney, No. 16-024, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/18/17).

Statute mandates that an employer, who relied on permissive language of an earlier version of Form VRS-180 rather than the plain wording of the statute, notify the Virginia Retirement System Board of its final determination that an employee was convicted of a felony that ‘arose from misconduct occurring on or after July 1, 2011, in any position in which the person was a member covered for retirement purposes under any retirement system administered by the Board. See opinion of Attorney General to Andrew R. McRoberts, Esquire, Essex County Attorney, No. 16-024, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/18/17).

§§ 51.1-124.14 through 51.1-124.19.
Reserved.